Nebraska, session 109, LB857.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB857 LB857
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2714 Any term used in sections 77-2714 to 77-27,123 shall have
the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of the
United States relating to federal income taxes, unless a different
meaning is clearly required. Any reference to the laws of the United
States shall mean the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended on January 1, 2024 and amendments thereto, other provisions of
the laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes, as
amended on January 1, 2024, and the rules and regulations issued under
such laws , as the same may be or become effective, at any time or from
time to time, for the taxable year. Any reference to either the Internal
Revenue Code of 1954, the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or the Internal
Revenue Code shall mean and include a reference to the other, whenever
appropriate. All other references to any tax contained within sections
77-2714 to 77-27,123 refer to income tax unless the contrary appears. Any
organization to the extent that it is exempt from income taxes under the
laws of the United States shall be exempt from income tax under the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-2714, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-